Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.015

Other grounds for issuance of search warrant.

Any such magistrate, when satisfied that there is reasonable cause, may also, upon like complaint made on oath, issue search warrant in the following cases, to wit:

(1) To search for and seize any counterfeit or spurious coin, or forged instruments, or tools, machines or materials, prepared or provided for making either of them.

(2) To search for and seize any gaming apparatus used or kept, and to be used in any unlawful gaming house, or in any building, apartment or place, resorted to for the purpose of unlawful gaming.

(3) To search for and seize any evidence material to the investigation or prosecution of any homicide or any felony: PROVIDED, That if the evidence is sought to be secured from any radio or television station or from any regularly published newspaper, magazine or wire service, or from any employee of such station, wire service or publication, the evidence shall be secured only through a subpoena duces tecum unless: (a) There is probable cause to believe that the person or persons in possession of the evidence may be involved in the crime under investigation; or (b) there is probable cause to believe that the evidence sought to be seized will be destroyed or hidden if subpoena duces tecum procedures are followed. As used in this subsection, "person or persons" includes both natural and judicial persons.

(4) To search for and seize any instrument, apparatus or device used to obtain telephone or telegraph service in violation of RCW 9.26A.110 or 9.26A.115.

[ 2003 c 53 s 94; 1980 c 52 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 75 s 2; 1969 c 83 s 1; 1949 c 86 s 1; Code 1881 s 986; 1873 p 216 s 154; 1854 p 101 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 2238. Formerly RCW 10.79.010, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.